North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130. Public Health. [Repealed]
§§ 130-1 through 130-285.
[Repealed]

Repealed.

Cross References.

For the Midwifery Practice Act, see G.S. 90-178.1 et seq.

For provisions relating to the public health, see Chapter 130A.

As to health care facilities and services, see Chapter 131E.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1983, c. 775, s. 1, effective January 1, 1984, repealed G.S. 130-3(a), 130-9(e), 130-9.5, 130-9.7, 130-170.1, 130-170.2, 130-230, 130-232 to 130-235 and 130-264 to 130-277. Session Laws 1983, c. 891, s. 1, also effective January 1, 1984, repealed all of Chapter 130, except for those provisions repealed by c. 775, as listed above, and except for G.S. 130-166.21D, 130-187, and 130-203 to 130-205. Session Laws 1985, c. 462, s. 13, effective June 24, 1985, repealed G.S. 130-187 and 130-203 to 130-205. Session Laws 1989, c. 168, s. 10, effective May 30, 1989, repealed G.S. 130-166.21D.